Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3365.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.306, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Rulemaking. deleted text begin In establishingdeleted text end new text begin The commissioner must adoptnew text end the performance standards and certification process of subdivision 2deleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin andnew text end the program guidelines of subdivision 3deleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin as rulesnew text end and any other rules necessary to implement this section, deleted text begin the commissioner isdeleted text end subject to chapter 14. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end